Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5490.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-91-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-91 entitled "School and
Youth Programs Concussion Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-91-3. School district’s guidelines to be developed and implemented.
(a) The department of education and the department of health shall work in concert with
the Rhode Island Interscholastic League to develop and promulgate guidelines to inform and
educate coaches, teachers, school nurses, youth athletes, and their parents and/or guardians of the
nature and risk of concussion and head injury, including continuing to play after concussion or head
injury. A concussion and head injury information sheet shall be signed and returned by the youth
athlete and the athlete’s parent and/or guardian prior to the youth athlete’s return to practice or
competition.
(b) School districts are required to use training materials made available by the United
States Center for Disease Control and Prevention entitled “Heads Up: Concussion in the High
School Sports/Concussion in Youth Sports” and any updates or amendments thereto, or training
materials substantively and substantially similar thereto. The department of education shall post
training materials made available by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention and the Rhode
Island Interscholastic League on its website. All coaches and volunteers involved in a youth sport
or activity covered by this chapter must complete a training course and a refresher course annually
thereafter in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. All school nurses must complete a training
course and an annual refresher course in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. Teachers and

teachers’ aides are strongly encouraged to complete the training course in concussions and
traumatic brain injuries. Training may consist of videos, classes, and any other generally accepted
mode and medium of providing information.
(c) School districts are encouraged to have all student athletes perform baseline
neuropsychological testing, computerized or otherwise. Parents and/or guardians shall be provided
with information as to the risk of concussion and/or traumatic brain injuries prior to the start of
every sport season and they shall sign an acknowledgement as to their receipt of such information.
(d) A youth student athlete, who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or head injury in
a practice or game, shall be removed from competition at that time.
(e) A youth student athlete, who has been removed from play, may not return to play until
the athlete is evaluated by a licensed physician who may consult with an athletic trainer, all of
whom shall be trained in the evaluation and management of concussions. The athlete must receive
written clearance to return to play from that licensed physician.
(f) All school districts are encouraged to have an athletic trainer designated at each
secondary school within a district; provided, however, that notwithstanding the foregoing, all
school districts shall be required to designate an athletic trainer licensed pursuant to chapter 60 of
title 5 for each high school within its district, or similarly trained person, at all recreational and
athletic events addressed by this statute.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001028
========
LC001028 - Page 2 of 3